North Carolina statutes. Chapter 17. Habeas Corpus.
Article 1. Constitutional Provisions.

§ 17-1.
Remedy without delay for restraint of liberty.

Every person restrained of his liberty is entitled to a remedy to inquire into the lawfulness thereof, and to remove the same, if unlawful; and such remedy ought not to be denied or delayed.

History.

Const., art. 1, s. 18; Rev., s. 1819; C.S., s. 2203.

Cross References.

As to costs in habeas corpus, see

G.S. 6-21

.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 criminal law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1060 (1983).

§ 17-2.
Habeas corpus not to be suspended.

The privileges of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended.

History.

Const., art. 1, s. 21; Rev., s. 1820; C.S., s. 2204.

Cross References.

For constitutional provision, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 21.